Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska56-126
Mill owner; damages for injury to property; recovery for.

If any person shall injure, destroy or remove any such embankment, fortification or other works, the owner or occupier of such mill or machinery may recover of such person all damages which he may sustain by reason of such injury, destruction or removal.

G.S.1873, c. 44, § 26, p. 478;

R.S.1913, § 3999;

C.S.1922, § 3402;

C.S.1929, § 56-126;

R.S.1943, § 56-126.